Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB577.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-300 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Early-stage company" means a company that is:
(a) A small or medium-size company in its initial stages of operation;
(b) Characterized by new or evolving product or service development; and
(c) Establishing initial customer or market validation with potential material growth in employment or
revenue;
(2) "Entrepreneur-led economic development" means a strategy in which successful entrepreneurs contribute
to regional growth by mentoring new founders, strengthening local support networks, and helping guide
collaborative efforts that foster the development and scaling of innovative early-stage and high-growth
companies;
(3) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation;
(4) "High-growth company" means a company that is:
(a) A small or medium-size company; and
(b) Demonstrating or has demonstrated potential for rapid and sustained expansion in employment,
revenue, or market share with potential for continued material growth;
(5) "Hub" means a location identified as the headquarters for program activity in a region or subregion;
(6) "Medium-size company" means a business with fifty-one (51) to one hundred fifty (150) employees;
(7) "Program" means the Kentucky Entrepreneurship and Innovation Hub Program["Affiliate" means an ICC
identified as the headquarters for program activity in a region or subregion;
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Commercialization and Innovation established
in KRS 154.12-278;
(3) "ICC" means the Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center];
(8)[(4)] "Region" means a geographic area of Kentucky designated as having a unique innovation strategic plan
by the Office of Entrepreneurship[Department of Commercialization] and Innovation; and[
(5) "Satellite" means an office of an affiliate in a region]
(9) "Small company" means a business with fifty (50) or fewer employees.
Section 2. KRS 154.12-305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established the Kentucky Entrepreneurship and Innovation Hub Program[Kentucky Innovation and
Commercialization Center Program] within the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation[Department of
Commercialization and Innovation]. The goal of the [ICC ]program is to create products, new companies, and
value-added jobs in communities throughout the Commonwealth. Strategies to achieve this goal include:
(a) Increasing quality deal flow of knowledge-based, technology-intensive companies[technology-based
firms] in Kentucky;
(b) Increasing understanding of start-up process and investment practices;[ and]
(c) Providing value-added services to the start-up and investment community;
(d) Supporting entrepreneur-led economic development; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) Attracting workforce talent, investors, and start-up companies to Kentucky.
(2) The duties of the hubs[ICC program] shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Identifying and linking entrepreneurs, faculty, subject-matter experts, scientists, venture capitalists, and
other key individuals from the business sector, universities, community and technical colleges, local
leaders, and government for the creation and expansion of knowledge-based, technology-intensive
companies;
(b) Establishing a uniform protocol for assembling and communicating project concepts and opportunities;
(c) Supporting high-quality projects through the concept and development phases including services such
as market research, prototype development, business plan and strategies development, grant and
contract capabilities, and capital and management resource identification; and
(d) Identifying, in the area of technology development, potential partners, strategic opportunities, training
and educational needs, and issues that inhibit the growth of technology sectors and business clusters in
the state.
Section 3. KRS 154.12-310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The program hubs[Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Centers] are private-public partnerships,
operating as a cohesive statewide infrastructure to support the implementation of key Kentucky Innovation Act
initiatives.
(2) The organization of the hubs[ICCs] shall be a statewide network[ of Kentucky innovative hubs], with the
location and services provided for each hub determined by the executive director in accordance with the
following:[of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.]
(a) The Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation shall be the central headquarters for the
program[Kentucky innovative] hubs and has primary responsibility for the following:
1. Managing and administering the[ ICC] program;
2. Establishing uniform program application, protocol, and operating guidelines when appropriate;
3. Supporting the protocol by creating and funding centralized services to be distributed throughout
the network; and
4. Identifying those issues, opportunities, and challenges that have statewide implications;[.]
(b) The hubs[regional affiliates] are responsible for fulfilling the duties as set forth in KRS 154.12-305
relating to the implementation of the region's innovation strategic plan and supporting the
implementation of the Kentucky Innovation Act initiatives in the region or subregion; and
(c) The hubs[satellites] are responsible for generating technology business development in their assigned
geographic area, acting as a bridge between individuals and companies[businesses] needing critical
early state concept and development work and the hubs[affiliate centers] that can provide this support.
The hubs[affiliates and satellites] provide a valuable assurance for equal access to the Kentucky Innovation
Act initiatives and funding, and provide an opportunity for full participation in rural and remote, as well as
metropolitan, areas of the state.
(3) The executive director[ of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation] shall have all the powers and
authority, not explicitly prohibited by statute, necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the
purposes of KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310.
(4) The executive director[ of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation] may, in effectuating the provisions
of KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310, contract with a science and technology organization as defined in KRS
164.6011 to administer and manage the[ ICC] program.
Section 4. KRS 164.6011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.6011 to 164.6029, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Applied research" means those research activities occurring at universities and in private enterprises that have
potential commercial application;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;

CHAPTER 114 3
(3) "Closely related family members" means any of the following in relation to an employee or their spouse:
(a) Parents or grandparents;
(b) Children or their spouses; or
(c) Siblings or their spouses;
(4) "Cluster" means a geographically bound concentration of similar, related, or complementary
companies[businesses] with active channels for business transactions, communications, and dialogue, that
share specialized infrastructure, labor markets, and services, and that are faced with common opportunities and
threats;
(5) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(6) "Early-stage company" means a company that is:
(a) A small or medium-size company in its initial stages of operation;
(b) Characterized by new or evolving product or service development; and
(c) Establishing initial customer or market validation with potential material growth in employment or
revenue;
(7) "Eligible company" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole
proprietorship, business trust, person, group, or other entity;
(8) "High-growth company" means a company that is:
(a) A small or medium-size company; and
(b) Demonstrating or has demonstrated potential for rapid and sustained expansion in employment,
revenue, or market share with potential for continued material growth;
(9)[(7)] "Kentucky-based company" means a company[business] with its principal place of business in
Kentucky or no less than fifty percent (50%) of its property and payroll located in Kentucky;
(10)[(8)] "Knowledge-based" means technology-intensive or driven by knowledge, innovation, and speed;
(11)[(9)] "Medium-size company" means a business with fifty-one (51) to one hundred fifty (150) employees;
(12)[(10)] "Qualified company" means an eligible company that may be granted a funding voucher or award
pending certification;
(13)[(11)] "Science and technology organization" means an independent, nonprofit or quasi-governmental
organization, with a statewide mission, that has a demonstrated history of managing complicated programs in
the areas of entrepreneurial innovation, science, and technology advancement;
(14)[(12)] "Seed funding" means financing that is provided for early-stage development, refinement, and
commercialization of a product, process, or innovation through continuing applied research, advancing the
patent process, determining commercial and market potential, or moving research toward development of a
prototype; and
(15)[(13)] "Small company" means a company[firm] with fifty (50) or fewer employees.
Section 5. KRS 164.6019 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established and created a trust and agency account entitled the ["]Kentucky enterprise fund["] for the
purpose of enabling early-stage or high-growth[small or medium-size], Kentucky-based companies to
undertake feasibility, concept development, research and development, [or ]commercialization, or expansion
work.
(2) The Kentucky enterprise fund may receive moneys from any public or private source, including but not limited
to general fund appropriations of the Commonwealth, grants, or contributions of money, property, labor, or
other things of value to be used to carry out the fund's operations, functions, and responsibilities, and to
otherwise make investments. Moneys received by the fund from a public or private source may be subject to
use restrictions, sector or cluster limitations, investment criteria, or other conditions imposed by the
contributing entity and are subject to approval by the cabinet, provided such conditions are consistent with
the purposes of the fund.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The Kentucky enterprise fund shall also receive moneys transferred from the Kentucky rural innovation fund
under KRS 164.6027, the Kentucky commercialization fund under KRS 164.6035, and the Kentucky
alternative fuel and renewable energy fund under KRS 154.20-410.
(4) Any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and
any income earned from the investments along with the unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall
not lapse, and shall be made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the Kentucky enterprise fund.
Section 6. KRS 164.6021 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall manage the Kentucky enterprise fund to provide capital to
early-stage and high-growth[small and medium-size], Kentucky-based companies to undertake feasibility,
concept development, research and development, [or ]commercialization, or expansion work.
(2) The purpose of the Kentucky enterprise fund is to:
(a) Accelerate knowledge transfer and technological innovation, improve economic competitiveness, and
spur economic growth in Kentucky-based companies;
(b) Support feasibility, concept development, research and development, or commercialization activities
that have clear potential to lead to commercially successful products, processes, or services within a
reasonable period of time;
(c) Stimulate growth-oriented enterprises within the Commonwealth;
(d) Encourage partnerships and collaborative projects between private enterprises, Kentucky's colleges and
universities, and research organizations, including collaborations involving one (1) or more such
entities;
(e) Promote research and development and commercialization activities that are market-oriented;[ and]
(f) Support early-stage and high-growth[small and medium-sized] companies; and
(g) Attract, recruit, and support early-stage and high-growth companies to locate, relocate, or establish a
substantial presence in the Commonwealth.
(3) The Kentucky enterprise fund shall be used to fund qualified companies in accordance with this section as
follows:
(a) Funding[Grants] of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for companies exploring the feasibility of
technology commercialization or projects related to feasibility studies, such as incubator and accelerator
programs;
(b) Funding of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for companies in the concept
development phase of technology commercialization;
(c) Funding of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for companies advancing and promoting the
program goals, as outlined in subsection (2) of this section; and
(d) For new investments made on or after July 1, 2021, no qualified company can receive a total investment
from the fund in excess of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(4) [Beginning July 1, 2021, ]The cabinet shall allocate at least twenty percent (20%) of the annual allotment of
funds for the Kentucky enterprise fund to qualified companies located in rural or enhanced incentive counties,
as certified under KRS 154.32-050, and at least twenty percent (20%) of the annual allotment of funds to
qualified companies located in Opportunity Zones, as designated by the Commonwealth and certified by the
Secretary of the United States Treasury.
(5) For all funding totaling more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the science and technology organization
or any entity designated by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation shall
receive an equity interest in the qualified company, such as a general or limited partnership interest, limited
liability company interest, common or preferred stock with or without voting rights and without regard to
seniority position, forms of subordinate or convertible unsecured debt, or both, with warrants, rights, or other
means of equity conversion attached, a near equity interest such as a simple agreement for future equity or
"SAFE agreement", or other convertible debt instruments that are determined to qualify as an adequate
investment interest by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
Section 7. KRS 164.6023 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 114 5
(1) The science and technology organization shall have the authority, upon approval by the cabinet, to review
applications, qualify companies, and certify qualified companies to receive funding from the Kentucky
enterprise fund.
(2) The science and technology organization shall develop application criteria and an application process subject
to the following limitations. The proposed project shall be likely to:
(a) Produce a measurable result and be technically sound;
(b) Lead to innovative technology or new knowledge;
(c) Lead to commercially successful products, processes, or services within a reasonable period of time; or
(d) Show significant potential for stimulating economic growth and a reasonable probability to enhance
employment opportunities within the Commonwealth.
(3) The applicant shall provide to the science and technology organization an application that shall include but not
be limited to the following information:
(a) Verification that the applicant is an eligible company that:
1. Meets the definition of a Kentucky-based company, or has demonstrated potential to become a
Kentucky-based company within one hundred eighty (180) days after certification authorizing
funding under subsection (5) of this section, or within a timeframe determined by the
executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation; and
2. Is an early-stage or high-growth[and medium-size company or small] company;
(b) A technology description and plan that is sufficient for outside expert review;
(c) A detailed financial analysis that includes the commitment of resources by the applicant and others;
(d) Sufficient detail concerning proposed project partners, type and amount of work to be performed and
financing to be contributed by each partner, and expected product or service with estimated costs to be
reflected in the negotiated contract or agreement; and
(e) A statement of the economic development potential of the project.
(4) The science and technology organization shall conduct an independent review with the use of outside experts
to evaluate each application. Following the application review, the science and technology organization shall
make a determination of the application and may determine that the applicant is a qualified company as
defined in KRS 164.6011.
(5) Upon a qualified company's presentation of a legal agreement or contract meeting the conditions under
subsection (6) of this section, the science and technology organization shall present the qualified company, the
project partners, if any, and the college or university in the Commonwealth, if any, with a certification
authorizing funding.
(6) Prior to receiving certification authorizing funding from the science and technology organization, the qualified
company shall:
(a) Negotiate an agreement and funding contract with a college or university in the Commonwealth, if any,
and with a project partner, if any, that is satisfactory to the science and technology organization, to
undertake the commercialization work; and
(b) Provide assurance to the science and technology organization that the college or university and the
qualified company have negotiated the ownership and disposition of patents, royalties, all other
intellectual property rights, and equity or related position relating to the contract between the qualifying
company and the college or university;
unless the requirement to partner with a college or university is recommended to be waived by the science and
technology organization.
(7) Prior to certifying a qualified company, the science and technology organization may negotiate with the
qualified company the ownership and disposition of patents, royalties, all other intellectual property rights, and
an equity, near equity such as a simple agreement for future equity or "SAFE agreement", convertible debt, or
similar investment format that is approved by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Innovation on behalf of the Kentucky enterprise fund for the sole purpose of reinvesting and sustaining a
revolving fund to carry out the provisions of KRS 164.6021 and 164.6023.
(8) The science and technology organization, upon approval by the cabinet, shall set forth guidelines as to when
and how all areas of the state will be notified about the program's availability and a program schedule,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) A review cycle including:
1. A deadline for submission of applications at least biannually; and
2. A deadline for reviewing applications of no more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
application submission deadline; and
(b) A deadline, from the date an applicant is determined to be a qualified company, by which certification
shall be made. If certification is not made by that deadline the funding voucher award is made void.
Section 8. KRS 154.20-234 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The requirements for small businesses, investors, and investments to be qualified for participation in the Angel
Investor Program are as follows:
(a) To be certified as a qualified small business, the business shall demonstrate to the authority that it is an
entity which, at the time the small business requests certification:
1. Has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less or net income after federal income
taxes for each of the two (2) preceding fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less;
2 Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth, or will be
actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth after the
receipt of a qualified investment by a qualified investor;
3. Has no more than one hundred (100) full-time employees;
4. Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets, operations, and employees located in the
Commonwealth; and
5. Has at no time received an aggregate amount of qualified investments that has allowed qualified
investors to receive more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in angel investor credits;
(b) To be certified as a qualified investor, an individual investor shall demonstrate to the authority that he
or she:
1. Is an individual natural person who may utilize a single-member limited liability company to
make the investment as long as the individual natural person is the owner and the limited liability
company is a disregarded entity;
2. Qualifies as an accredited investor pursuant to Regulation D of the United States Securities and
Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. sec. 230.501, in effect as of the date the individual investor
requests certification;
3. Does not hold in excess of twenty percent (20%) ownership interest in, and is not employed by,
the qualified small business prior to making the qualified investment in that qualified small
business;
4. Is not closely related to an individual who holds in excess of twenty percent (20%) ownership
interest in, or who is employed by, the qualified small business prior to making the qualified
investment in that qualified small business. For purposes of this subparagraph, "closely related"
means any of the following in relation to the owner or owners or spouse of the owner or owners:
a. Parents or grandparents;
b. Children or their spouses; or
c. Siblings or their spouses; and
5. Seeks a financial return from the investment made in the qualified small business;[ and]
(c) To be certified as a qualified investment, the investment shall:

CHAPTER 114 7
1. Be a cash investment of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in a qualified small business
made:
a. Directly by a qualified investor; or
b. Indirectly through a pass-through entity formed for the sole purpose of making one (1)
or more investments in a single, qualified small business and treated as a pass-through
entity for federal income tax purposes;
2. If made through a pass-through entity, the amount eligible for the tax credit shall be limited to
that individual's pro rata share of the capital contributed to the entity that is ultimately
invested in the qualified small business; and
3.[2.] Be offered and executed in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and
regulations; and
(d) A pass-through entity utilized under paragraph (c) of this subsection shall not make qualified
investments in more than one (1) company.
(2) In consideration for the qualified investment, the qualified investor shall receive an equity interest, or a near
equity interest, such as a simple agreement for future equity, or "SAFE agreement", or a convertible debt
instrument in the qualified small business.
(3) The authority may establish additional requirements and guidelines for the efficient implementation and
administration of the Kentucky Angel Investment Act and to carry out its purposes.
Section 9. KRS 154.20-254 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Affiliate" means any person or entity who directly or indirectly, through one (1) or more intermediaries,
controls or is controlled by or is under common control with another person or entity;
(2) "Agreement" means an investment fund agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.20-255(5) by the
authority and an investment fund manager on behalf of the investment fund, the investment fund manager, and
any investor in the investment fund;
(3) "Amended application" means a document submitted by an investment fund manager, in a form acceptable to
the authority and on behalf of an investment fund, for the purpose of increasing the aggregate amount of
available tax credits;
(4) "Applicant" means any person or entity who has not received approval from the authority as an investment
fund manager, but who has submitted or will submit an application to the authority for approval as an
investment fund manager;
(5) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority or its designee;
(6) "Cash contribution" means an investment of money by an investor in an investment fund under the terms of
KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284;
(7) "Committed cash contribution" means a legally binding agreement by an investor to make a cash contribution
in an amount set forth in a written agreement between an investor and an investment fund;
(8) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(9) "Credit" means a nonrefundable credit for investors against state tax liability allocated and granted by the
authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-258 for qualified investments made by approved investment funds;
(10) "Entity" means any corporation, limited liability company, business development corporation, partnership,
limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional
service organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted;
(11) "Financial institution" means "financial institution" as defined in KRS 136.500(10) and includes savings and
loan associations, savings banks, and similar institutions subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.290,
136.300, or 136.310;
(12) "Insurance company" means any insurance company subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.320, 136.330,
or 304.3-270;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(13) "Investment fund" means any entity that is organized by an investment fund manager in compliance with
applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations, and is approved by the authority to make qualified
investments pursuant to KRS 154.20-256;
(14) "Investment fund manager" means any person or entity that has been approved by the authority to manage one
(1) or more investment funds authorized under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and is in
compliance with all applicable federal and state regulations;
(15) "Investor" means any person or entity, including financial institutions and insurance companies, that is subject
to state tax liability and that makes a cash contribution or a committed cash contribution to an investment fund
in accordance with the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and has not been convicted of violating
any of Kentucky's tax laws within the past ten (10) years;
(16) "Knowledge-based" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;
(17) "Nonprofit entity" means an investor that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(18) "Qualified activity" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.20-230;
(19) "Qualified investment" means an investment of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in a small business by
an investment fund, in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations, seeking a
financial return based upon that consideration. In consideration for the qualified investment, the investment
fund shall receive an equity interest in the small business, such as a general or limited partnership interest,
common or preferred stock with or without voting rights and without regard to seniority position, forms of
subordinate or convertible unsecured debt, or both, with warrants, rights, or other means of equity conversion
attached; and
(20) "Small business" means any entity which at the time a qualified investment is made by an investment fund:
(a) 1. Has a net worth of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less or net income after federal income
taxes for each of the two (2) preceding fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less;
or
2. Is a knowledge-based business, as shall be prescribed by the executive director of the Office of
Entrepreneurship and Innovation[commissioner of the Department of Commercialization and
Innovation], and has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less;
(b) Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth, or will be actively
and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth after the receipt of a qualified
investment by an investment fund;
(c) Has no more than one hundred (100) employees; and
(d) Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets, operations, and employees located in Kentucky.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.